Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 461.220 is amended to read:
461.220. (1) Upon recommendation of the Director of the  Oregon State Lottery, the Oregon State
Lottery Commission shall adopt  rules that specify the number and value of prizes for winning tickets
or shares in each lottery game including, without limitation, cash prizes, merchandise prizes,  prizes
consisting of deferred payments or annuities  and prizes of tickets or shares in the same lottery game
or other lottery games conducted by the Oregon State Lottery.
(2) In each lottery game utilizing tickets, the following information  shall be printed on each
ticket:
(a) A close approximation of the odds of winning some prize or some cash prize, as appropriate
for the lottery game.
(b) An approximation of a payout percentage that will be returned to players in  the form of
prizes for the lottery game. For online games, the approximation may be based on the  average
payout percentage over several prior years.
(c) The statement that “Lottery games are based  on chance, should be played for entertainment
only and should not be played for investment purposes.”
(3) A detailed tabulation of the  estimated number of prizes of each particular prize denomination
that are expected to be awarded  in each lottery game and the close approximation of the odds of
winning such prizes shall be available at each location at which tickets or shares in  such lottery
games are offered for sale to the public.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commission may specify by rule  the num-
ber and  value of prizes for lottery games that use video devices or that use tickets or shares that
allow a player to manually reveal covered play symbols, or the commission may make such infor-
mation available at each location that offers such games using video devices, tickets or shares for
sale to the public.
(5) All television, radio and  newspaper advertising of a lottery game shall include a disclaimer
representing a close approximation of the odds of winning some prize and an approximation  of the
amount that will be returned to the  players in the form of prizes for the game in the following
words: “The odds of winning some prize are one in (some number). The prize payout percentage  is
(some number).” where the numbers stated represent a close approximation of the odds of winning
some prize and the prize payout percentage. However, this subsection does not  apply to advertising
the purpose of which is to advertise the location  where tickets may be purchased or to provide in-
formation about the winners.
Enrolled Senate Bill 914 (SB 914-A) Page 1
(6) All  television, radio and newspaper advertising of lottery games funded by the lottery com-
mission, including advertising that is intended to  indicate where tickets may be purchased or to
provide information about prize  winners, shall include the disclaimer that “Lottery games are based
on chance, should be played for entertainment only and should  not be played for investment pur-
poses.”
(7) All television, radio and newspaper advertising  intended to publicize projects or programs
funded by lottery dollars shall include the disclaimer that “Lottery games are based on chance  and
should be played for entertainment  only.” However, this subsection does not apply to any such ad-
vertising that has the sole purpose of educating  the public about gambling addiction or available
treatments.
(8) All billboard advertising intended to promote a  lottery game, to indicate where tickets may
be purchased or to provide information about prize winners shall include :
(a) The disclaimer that “Lottery games should not be played for investment purposes[ .]” ; and
(b) The following statement or a  substantially similar statement: “Need help with prob-
lem gambling? Call or text” followed by the phone number of a problem gambling helpline.
(9) All billboard  advertising intended to publicize projects or programs funded by lottery dollars
shall include :
(a) The disclaimer that “Lottery games should be played for entertainment only[ .]” ; and
(b) The statement described in subsection (8)(b) of this section.
(10) A disclaimer  or statement  required by this section to be included in a written  advertise-
ment shall be of a size and in a form that allows  an individual to readily notice and read the
statement. A disclaimer required by this section to be included in a television or  radio advertise-
ment shall be  spoken aloud and, in the case of television, must also be displayed visually in a form
that allows an individual to readily notice and read the statement.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 461.220 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to
billboard advertising that is first published on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Passed by Senate March 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 914 (SB 914-A) Page 2